src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Vlax Romani language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON m1
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>és # ;
+N+Sg: obl ;
+N+Pl+Nom:%>é # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>é # ;
+N+Pl:%>é obl ;

LEXICON m2
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>és # ;
+N+Sg: obl ;
+N+Pl+Nom:%>é # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>é # ;
+N+Pl:%>é obl ;


LEXICON f1
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>já # ;
+N+Sg: obl ;
+N+Pl+Nom:%>já # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ján # ;
+N+Pl:%>ján obl ;

LEXICON obl
+Dat:%>kê # ;
+Ins:%>sa # ;
+Abl:%>tar # ;
+Loc:%>te # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
